Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201571-1356
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Cremation of Human Remains Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Alternative container means a container in which human remains are placed in a cremation chamber for cremation;

(2) Authorizing agent means a person vested with the right to control the disposition of human remains pursuant to section 30-2223 or a person authorized on the decedent's United States Department of Defense record of emergency data, DD Form 93, or its successor form, as provided in section 38-1425;

(3) Casket means a rigid container made of wood, metal, or other similar material, ornamented and lined with fabric, which is designed for the encasement of human remains;

(4) Cremated remains means the residue of human remains recovered after cremation and the processing of such remains by pulverization, leaving only bone fragments reduced to unidentifiable dimensions, and the unrecoverable residue of any foreign matter, such as eyeglasses, bridgework, or other similar material, that was cremated with the human remains;

(5) Cremated remains receipt form means a form provided by a crematory authority to an authorizing agent or his or her representative that identifies cremated remains and the person authorized to receive such remains;

(6) Cremation means the technical process that uses heat and evaporation to reduce human remains to bone fragments;

(7) Cremation chamber means the enclosed space within which a cremation takes place;

(8) Crematory means a building or portion of a building which contains a cremation chamber and holding facility;

(9) Crematory authority means the legal entity subject to licensure by the department to maintain and operate a crematory and perform cremation;

(10) Crematory operator means a person who is responsible for the operation of a crematory;

(11) Delivery receipt form means a form provided by a funeral establishment to a crematory authority to document the receipt of human remains by such authority for the purpose of cremation;

(12) Department means the Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services;

(13) Director means the Director of Public Health of the Division of Public Health;

(14) Funeral director has the same meaning as in section 71-507;

(15) Funeral establishment has the same meaning as in section 38-1411;

(16) Holding facility means the area of a crematory designated for the retention of human remains prior to cremation and includes a refrigerated facility;

(17) Human remains means the body of a deceased person, or a human body part, in any stage of decomposition and includes limbs or other portions of the anatomy that are removed from a person or human remains for medical purposes during treatment, surgery, biopsy, autopsy, or medical research;

(18) Permanent container means a receptacle made of durable material for the long-term placement of cremated remains;

(19) Temporary container means a receptacle made of cardboard, plastic, or other similar material in which cremated remains are placed prior to the placement of such remains in an urn or other permanent container;

(20) Veteran means a person who served on active duty as a member of the United States Armed Forces, a member of the Nebraska National Guard, or a member of the United States Reserve Forces, who was discharged or released from such service under conditions other than dishonorable, and who is eligible for burial in a veteran cemetery;

(21) Veteran cemetery means a cemetery under the control of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs National Cemetery Administration or the Nebraska Department of Veterans' Affairs; and

(22) Veterans service organization means an association, corporation, or other entity that is:

(a) A charitable organization that is tax exempt under section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and

(b) Organized for the benefit of veterans burial and interment and recognized by the Memorial Affairs Division of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Nebraska Department of Veterans' Affairs. The term includes a member or employee of an eligible nonprofit veterans association, corporation, or entity that specifically assists in facilitating the identification, recovery, and interment of the unclaimed cremated remains of veterans.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 469;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1186;

Laws 2014, LB998, § 15;

Laws 2015, LB146, § 2.